Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.310

Coverage, classification, registration, of workers.

The department shall establish by rule and regulation various classes of emergency workers, the scope of the duties of each class, and the conditions under which said workers shall be deemed to be on duty and covered by the provisions of this chapter. The department shall also adopt rules and regulations prescribing the manner in which emergency workers of each class are to be registered.

[ 1986 c 266 s 36; 1984 c 38 s 32; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 33; 1953 c 223 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.